North Carolina, session 2025, SB281.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division), the
sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2024-2025 fiscal year to
continue the compensation grants portion of the child care stabilization grants. The Division shall
continue the compensation grants portion of the child care stabilization grants through the fourth
quarter at the current 2024-2025 fiscal year level.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S281-v-1*